Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1609
Public employees; revocation of order to withhold wages.

The order or any revocation thereof, shall be executed and acknowledged, in the same manner that conveyances of real estate are required to be signed and acknowledged by the laws of this state, and where the employee is a married person, the order shall be executed and acknowledged by both husband and wife.

Laws 1949, c. 132, § 2, p. 347.